Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,131
Vote on disposition of assets.

Disposition of assets subject to section 21-29,129 shall be consented to by:

(1) At least two-thirds vote of patron members voting under section 21-2939; and

(2) At least a two-thirds vote of investor members, if any, under section 21-2942.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 131.